Utah statutes.
59-12-503.   Public transit taxes -- Local option direct transfer.
A county or municipality may elect, in writing, to have the portion of the
monthly funds transfer that is collected as a public transit sales and use tax
under Sections 59-12-501 and 59-12-502 to be transferred directly to a
designated public transit district, subject to the same charge as described
under Section 59-12-206.
